Hawaii, session 2026, HB564.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $72,844,100 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the thirty-second representative district, as follows: 1.   Aiea elementary school, Oahu A.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for reroofing. Total funding                          $205,700 B.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for replacement of campus fire alarm system including system monitoring. Total funding                          $2,420,000 2.   Aiea high school, Oahu A.   Design and construction for a new state of the art culinary program, new multipurpose room, and renovations of building C and changing culinary rooms to classrooms; ground and site improvements; equipment and appurtenances. Design                       $5,000,000 Construction                 $6,000,000 Equipment                    $1,000,000 Total funding                     $12,000,000 B.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for reroofing and recoating. Total funding                          $350,900 C.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for replacement of campus fire alarm system including system monitoring. Total funding                          $4,840,000 D.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for drainage improvements to prevent mold growth. Total funding                          $2,057,000 3.   Aiea intermediate school, Oahu A.   Design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for climate control for the cafeteria featuring an air conditioning system with possible added electrical upgrades and air flow systems (such as fans, etc.). Total funding                          $400,000 B.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for replacement of campus fire alarm system including system monitoring. Total funding                          $2,420,000 4.   Aliamanu elementary school, Oahu A.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for replacement of campus fire alarm system including system monitoring. Total funding                          $2,420,000 5.   Aliamanu middle school, Oahu A.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for replacement of campus fire alarm system including system monitoring. Total funding                          $2,420,000 6.   Makalapa elementary school, Oahu A.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for replacement of portables. Total funding                          $3,000,000 7.   Moanalua elementary school, Oahu A.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for reroofing eight portables. Total funding                          $387,200 B.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for reroofing four portables. Total funding                          $151,250 C.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for walkway roof repair. Total funding                          $242,000 D.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for replacement of campus fire alarm system including system monitoring. Total funding                          $2,420,000 E.   Construction of a multipurpose innovation center, including ground site improvements. Total funding                          $2,900,000 8.   Moanalua high school, Oahu A.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for reroofing P0427. Total funding                          $22,688 B.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for reroofing P0428. Total funding                          $22,688 C.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for reroofing P9 and P10. Total funding                          $54,450 D.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for replacement of campus fire alarm system including system monitoring. Total funding                          $4,840,000 E.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for SPED improvements. Total funding                          $1,000,000 F.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for ADA improvements (CTE)  Phase 2. Total funding                          $500,000 G.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for a new girls' varsity athletic locker room, in accordance with Title IX compliance, which requires demolition of the existing weight room. Total funding                          $600,000 H.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for a new weight room replacement, which will feature two classrooms for athletic trainers, restrooms, and an elevator. Design & Planning             $3,000,000 Construction                 $16,000,000 Equipment & Furnishings $1,000,000 Total funding                     $20,000,000 9.   Moanalua middle school, Oahu A.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for reroofing the kindergarten building. Total funding                          $390,225 10.  Radford high school, Oahu A.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for replacement of campus fire alarm system including system monitoring. Total funding                          $4,840,000 B.  Plans, land, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for renovations of weight room. Plans $1,000 Land $4,000 Design $4,000 Construction $2,379,000 Equipment                    $10,000 Total funding                     $2,389,000 11.  Red hill elementary school, Oahu A.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for replacement of campus fire alarm system including system monitoring. Total funding                          $2,420,000 12.  Scott elementary school, Oahu A.   Plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for replacement of campus fire alarm system including system monitoring. Total funding                          $2,420,000 SECTION 2.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement projects authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation that are unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3.  The sums appropriated for the respective capital projects set forth in section 1 shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________